Indiana, session 2026, SB120.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 4-38-2-16.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 16.5. "Proposition bet" is a wager on a specific event
or outcome within a game that is not directly tied to the final score.
SECTION 2. IC 4-38-5-5, AS ADDED BY P.L.293-2019,
SECTION 43, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) A certificate holder or vendor may not
accept wagers on the following:
(1) High school and other amateur youth sporting events.
(2) A sporting event that has not been approved for sports
wagering by the commission.
(3) A proposition bet from an individual who is a collegiate
athlete in the sport the individual is attempting to bet on.
(b) The commission may impose a civil penalty of up to ten
thousand dollars ($10,000) upon an individual who:
(1) is a collegiate athlete; and
(2) attempted to place or placed a proposition bet on a game
2026 IN 120—LS 6358/DI 107


in the sport that the individual plays.
(c) A civil penalty collected under this section must be deposited
in the state general fund.
2026 IN 120—LS 6358/DI 107